And describe the mold. What is the mold that they're fitting into? I was told that most of the girls at this school would be carrying either Kate Spade or Prada bags. Is that true? Most often would you bring it up, or would they bring it up? What would you say? How would you explain Christianity there? And they think that Christianity sanctions that, because these things are happening in a Christian country. Talking to you, I'm reminded of this story that I once heard about-- there's a German Jewish filmmaker named Marcel Ophuls, who in the last part of his career in the 1960s made a number of films, documentaries-- The Sorrow and the Pity, The Memory of Justice-- where he was interviewing the Nazi high command from World War II. And he would make these films, and people would ask him, how did he feel, as a German Jew, interviewing these former members of the Nazi high command, the ones who had survived? Wasn't it uncomfortable for him? And he would say, like, no, it wasn't. He said he found, in fact, that he had more in common with them than he had with most people, because they were both interested in history. They were both interested in the past. How do you know that they appreciated it? What are you talking about? When the Taliban would challenge you, what would they say? You said the Taliban would challenge you. What would they say? What did they ask? What would you say? And did that answer satisfy them, or did they still feel that you would be better off Muslim? And so when would you record? Well let's go through some of these. Let me ask you to explain what, for example, is happening in this one. What is this? Where are we? Now you had trained for this kind of thing. How was actually being in the real thing different from the training? Now you don't really say that much to your wife on most of the tapes. Usually, it's just long stretches of bombs going off. Let me play another one, and ask you to just explain who is talking in this. [GUNFIRE] And so in that situation is there just a lot of sitting there and chewing the fat? And are there tanks between you and the enemy? And your weapon, the weapon mounted on your vehicle, could it shoot back at them? Or was it too far away for that particular weapon? And so you're just sitting there without any kind of armor on you, just sitting there waiting. That does not sound like a very pleasant job. What is it like for you to hear these tapes? I know that that's one reason why you were hesitant to talk to us, that your wife was concerned about you listening back to these tapes and thinking through all this again. Did your wife eventually listen to these tapes that you originally made for her? Could you talk about the impulse that made you want to make the tapes, that you wanted her to have a tape if something would happen to you, a tape of the moment that it happened? Now on February 27, 1991, you made some recordings. Let me just ask you to explain what's going on in this first one. Now the prisoners are just-- they're just sitting there on the ground, basically, in the middle of where this road is this? Is that the deal? Right. So the commander knows everything that you're saying. He knows. He saw the rounds coming down. Now that's you? You're on here saying, it's murder. Tell the commander that they are willing to surrender. Did anyone tell the commanders that these guys were probably willing to surrender? Now since then, you have had a lot more combat experience. This is still pretty early in your combat career. Just explain briefly where else you served and where else you saw combat. And with more combat experience, do you feel the same way, that it was wrong for the commanders to just fire on these guys and not try to get them to surrender? This particular set of events on February 27, 1991 has gotten a certain amount of press coverage. Seymour Hersh wrote about it in The New Yorker. It was on ABC News. It has gotten a certain amount of coverage. Do you feel like the media's attention to it and the public's attention to it misunderstands it? The guys who were killing them never got word that these guys weren't armed. John, do you have friends who you served with in these particular fights who still feel like it was wrong to kill those guys? When you take a moment and you reflect on it, do you feel like there's a part of you that's rationalizing? So David Cossin, who made these tapes, now joins us to explain, first, if they worked. And how worried were you about how she would react to the first tape? And Allesandra is sitting right there with you, right? Could you put her on? Hi, Allesandra. So could I ask you to talk about what it was like getting the first of these tapes? Before you got the tapes, did it seem like such a serious thing that happened between you and him? On the tapes, he worries about being too intense or being too boring. Were there moments of the tapes that struck you that way? He's so in love with you on these tapes. And at that point, your friend Robin came up with a Plan B. And then, after all that, she takes around the tape record and then she gets other people to talk on your tape? Complete strangers? So did this do what she wanted it to do? But isn't the point of being friends with somebody that, when they tell you this information, that it happens in a conversation, that that's not the background for the friendship, that that actually is the friendship. And it's 1963. You're how old at that point? So you've gone broke. You're 23. And then you come up with this Plan B. Wait, wait wait. Kidnapping seemed like a good idea and you put a business plan together? You say that kidnapping seemed like a reasonable option. Wasn't there any part that kind of horrified you? So explain to me who you decided to kidnap. Nancy? And had you met him before? How much ransom money were you going to ask for? And you decided you were going to take the money and then you were going to do what to make it back? And so you were going to take this capital, you were going to invest in this stuff, and then you were going to make a profit over, I guess, a couple years, right? And then at the end of five years, you were going to give the money back to Sinatra? Just explain how the plan of operation was going to go, how the whole thing would come off, where everybody would be at the end. How was that [UNINTELLIGIBLE]? You mean help his image? You know the thing about that plan, Barry, is that in a way it's utterly logical. It just proceeds from a premise that's so crazy. He thinks it's a phony phone call. Barry, did it did occur to you that the person who you were kidnapping and their family would be traumatized and frightened? I wonder if the fact that you constructed such an elaborate web of logic with your business plan, that made the kidnapping seem so reasonable and even good for the Sinatras, I wonder if that prevented you at the time from comprehending what you were putting them through. You know? What was the sign that it had God's approval? As you've gotten older, and sobered up, and gotten wiser, does God still talk to you? Do you wish you had a job which put you more in the front lines? Do you feel in danger here? CVIC means? So where do you draw your inspiration from? And then where do you perform? Where's that? Sure, let's talk about something interesting. What are you liking about being on board? Which part of the lifestyle? Oh yeah? I've heard there's a lot of rumors on board a ship, like there's always rumors. What are some of the rumors that you've heard? What happens if they caught for that? How come you chose the service? Really, court-ordered? They gave you the choice of jail or the Navy? You don't have to tell me the answer to this, but what kind of trouble were you in? Drugs? How much jail would you have had to do? So how do you like it? So what do you do on your job? Like what is there to do? And what are you looking for? You haven't seen anything yet?  It's actually like people are pretty well behaved on this boat. How often are you asked this question? And then in English it gives a translation. It says-- They're talking to him over the radio? He's right over the edge of the deck? Here comes another one. Just describe how he's doing. Who was your chief? Hey chief, do you ever think about the fact that you're serving over here in this particular ocean, this particular body of water, how long people have been traveling by sea across this? Here you are working for the mightiest navy in the history of the world.  Oh. Like, Ed meant you?  Why? What do you remember about his homework?  Like the word forbidden. And what were you guys doing?  I would think that, that would be very hard.  Watch The New Love Boat? Is Chad Everett on The New Love Boat? He was a guest star? I see.  What was that like? Right. Did he laugh? Yeah.  Well, let's let Chad come in, and let's have you sing.  All right.  Hey, Sue?  I've often been in the situation where I have to walk up to a stranger on the street with a microphone and a tape recorder, and I always get a little nervous. Do you get nervous?  Do you find that it's hard, sometimes, getting people to talk to you?  Are there times, Arthur, where you're looking through the camera at a moment like that, where you feel scared for them?  Arthur, there are a lot of moments in the film where it seems like the reporters are standing there, and they're not exactly sure what to say next or what to ask next. Why not give them questions? So, Ron, you do such a nice job with this guy. You know, it doesn't seem like he's all that interested in talking, and then you find stuff to talk to him about where it seems like he actually cares about it. You all bring out a really nice side of people.  Wow.  What you're making me realize is that my instinct in asking you, even this particular set of questions about this, is suddenly seeming very wrong.  By understanding them.  I have to say I have to stop you there because I feel like we're getting to that big moment that you tried to avoid in the film. Now did Manright understand that he had been sabotaged? Another multibillion dollar company that Morrill studied is one that he calls Playco, in the toy and education product business. Unlike Old Financial-- where bosses were bosses and underlings were underlings, and so all the scheming had to go on in secret-- at Playco, there was no real hierarchy. It wasn't clear who was in charge of whom. And while that might sound like a kind of nice place to work, with no big bosses, it turns out that with no one absolutely in charge to make decisions and keep people in line, all the fighting was right out in the open. At meetings, people would try to humiliate and out argue each other. They would form alliances. The executives at Playco would talk all the time about honor and respect, as if they were medieval knights, or maybe mob figures. Yeah, just tell what happened between those two. There is this idea in capitalism that companies are making decisions, and products, and strategy, based on rational evaluation of the market and their customers. To what degree is that true, based on what you saw? And to what degree are decisions being made based on office politics, and not a rational evaluation of where their company is in the market?  A person who actually has cancer but doesn't know it because the slides got switched?  The computer voice stress analyzer. Just explain what this is.  One of the most fascinating things about watching the videotape of this happening is how the police officer involves him in the process of working with this machine. For a long time, they sit down and they make up the questions together. Michael helps make up the questions. And he gets completely caught up in it. And then they give him the questions and the police officer leaves the room and comes back with the results and talked to him about the results and then finally reveals to him that on one of the questions, question number 12 in the little questionnaire they made up, he failed. The question, "Do you know who took Stephanie's life? Do you know who took you sister's life?"  At some point very early on, they start lying to him about what evidence they have. They just say straight up, "We found her blood in your room." And it freaks him out.  It had become one lie after another about what they have pointing to him. Is that legal?  And, in fact, if they're telling the truth, there is no other logical possibility. He must have done it.  At one point, right around this point where they're pressing him about the notion, well, maybe he did and he blacked out, they just leave the room. They leave him alone. The camera stays on him. And he just puts his head in his arms and just sobs. He just sobs and sobs. It's heart wrenching.  If I'm being interrogated by the police and if they're roughing me up and they're playing with what I'm thinking about myself and what I'm thinking about a crime, if I think to myself, "All right, I'm pretty sure I'm innocent here. I don't remember committing this crime. And these guys are just nuts. I'm not going to get out of here until I sign a paper." Let's say I sign the paper. I think to myself, "All right, I'm going to sign a confession." Because eventually, I'm be in front of a judge and I could just tell the judge, "Look, those guys were playing with my mind. We were in this tiny room. But here I am with you. I'm telling you this is the actual truth. I was just saying that stuff there to get out of that room." Do I have a shot?  Does that usually work?  So in the end, Michael Crowe, 14 years old, confesses to the murder of his own sister and even sort of believes that he did it. And one of the most disturbing things about watching this it is the police officers who do this, they don't seem like they're corrupt cops. Do you know? They don't seem like the guys who are out to pin a murder on an innocent kid. They seem like they actually believe they're doing their jobs and doing a good job of it and they believe he did it.  I have to say, I can't figure out which I find more disturbing, the thought that some police are corrupt and forcing confessions out of people or this thought that basically, this is just the institutional way that we get a confession in our country. Do you know what I mean? "This the way we do it. We lie to them about the evidence we've got." You know what I mean? That seems, in a way, more disturbing. Or I can't even tell which is more disturbing.  Does the threat of civil litigation, of people suing, as in this case with Michael Crowe's family suing the city of Escondido, as in the case that we're looking at elsewhere in today's radio show, this Roscetti case where these guys who went away for 15 years are suing the City of Chicago and the police officers. Does the fear of being sued and having to pay out millions of dollars to falsely accuse people actually cause police departments to change in any cases that you've seen? You'd think that science had gotten further than that. Wait, wait, wait. He was bringing up the fact that he had a lawsuit? You called the IRS on the guy? Your therapist, right? Basically, to call in the city. That, in fact, he deserves it. And you had no other recourse? It's like, somehow, if you picture your family as this little solar system, in and of itself, with its own set of normal gravitational fields and all that, suddenly-- I don't even know what-- another star, another planet entered in. And it completely shifted everyone's orbit away from the way it normally is. Because in the old solar system, pretty much, you were the sun. You were at the center. Oh, I didn't realize that, that there was an actual question of if he even existed. Mike Brown covered all this for the Chicago Sun-Times. He says that the other Jesse L. Jackson turned out to be a retired truck driver who lived in a suburb called Robbins, 68 years old, no previous political experience. Wait, wait, Andrew Jackson? Explain what you mean. Yeah, of course. Right, right, of course. He's on the money. From the congressman's point of view, this is all pretty much exactly what you do not want people talking about in the newspapers and on television. Again, imagine you have spent your whole life trying to get out from under the shadow of that other Jesse Jackson, your father, and now there is yet another Jesse Jackson. And the main story about your reelection is not what you've accomplished for your district, or what you hope to accomplish, but once again, did you get your job on your daddy's name. Now, the congressman is saying that he's got affidavits from people who went around and got signatures to get this other Jesse Jackson-- the one from Robbins-- onto the ballot. He says he has got affidavits from some of those people, saying that they met, they were organized, in Shaw headquarters. What do you all say to that? Wait, wait, and what does the water from DC do to you? Yeah, I was wondering if you think we should think it's tragic or just funny. The Eddie Murphy movie being? You think that actually they saw the movie? Wait, you actually went out into the street, and you knelt? What happened? A very good question, I should say. Now, up until that moment that you made the decision, had you been kind of depressed? How do you have electricity if the rest of the house doesn't? What was the first thing you did on the first day after you turned 16, and you had the freedom to do what you wanted? One of the teenage girls in the movie, Velda, says, "God talks to me in one ear, Satan in the other. Part of me wants to be like my parents, but the other part wants the jeans, the haircut, to do what I want." Is that your experience, too? Or was it your experience, this feeling of, OK, God's in one ear, and Satan is in the other? And was there any part of you where you were afraid that if you didn't return to the Amish lifestyle, that you would be punished, that you would go to hell? Do you think hell exists? And do you believe it? We're doing another story in this week's radio show about these teenagers outside Dallas. And there's a church youth group that they're part of that does something called a Hell House, where every Halloween, they stage all the ways that somebody can end up in hell. And the idea is to scare people so bad, and young people especially, that they'll never try anything. Do you think it's an advantage to their way to try to protect their kids? I think there are people all over this country who are trying to protect their kids from all the bad things that your elders sort of pushed you towards, partying, and you know. Why? I wondered, are the church elders in your church counting on the fact that, when you go out and you see what the rest of the world is like, it won't seem so great? 90%, they said. 90% of the people go back. And so how are you different? Yeah. Oh, I see. So you actually had to make a life outside of the Amish community. So then it was easier just to stay out. How are you doing? Are you as happy, do you think, as your friends who went back to the Amish way of life? And do you have moments where you actually find yourself still wondering, "Oh, I wonder if I would have been better off if I had gone back"? Yeah, that is a strong feeling of romance to overcome that barrier. Tom are you there? Ray, are you there? OK. So repeat after me, from WBEZ Chicago. And Public Radio International. It's This American Life. OK. What pros you are. Joe, what was your exact job at Car Talk? Now, Joe, your mother had a special feeling about this particular car. Wait, you wrote a song about the car? Joe, do you remember any of the song at all? Around 1989, 1990.  Could you do this wedding again next week and most of them wouldn't remember that it had happened this week?  It must be so odd for you to work creating moments for them that are instantly gone.  What did she say?  I understand. It kind of takes the shine off the other wedding if you're doing a wedding the week before.  No, these are mine.  Are those hers?  So, what did you think of the wedding?  Why is that? Like, we'll give it to them. That's a complete contradiction. Either you give it back or you hit them back. Tamal? And then that poster over there, lo what? He just walked away. So you had some sympathy for the Palestinians before. This is where we saw the photos of them holding their hands out the window, their bloody hands. But three years ago, you didn't believe that. They didn't become animals in three years. You know him, too? He an animal? But you do hate them. The judge in your case said, if I could sentence these officers to wear red noses for the bozos they are, I would do that. But I can't do that. What did you think of that? Hello, Alex. Alex. What's the reason for this week's show? Because the word "women" was in the title. And I notice you happen to have brought into the studio with you today a copy of The Women's Room. Act Two, Infinite Gent. Well, we just heard from somebody whose testosterone dropped to nothing. Now, we have the story of someone whose level got a huge boost. Griffin Hansbury was born female. But seven years ago, after college, Griffin took action to become a man. And he told this story of what it was like to experience the massive increase in testosterone that accompanies this change. He talked with our producer, Alex Blumberg. A warning to listeners that they talk about looking at women and wanting sex during this interview. How so? What are some of the misconceptions you run into? And then, if the main thing that testosterone corresponds with is decisiveness, how does that swing the whole rating? Again, Julie. Quick decisions, doesn't look back. You're regretting it even as you're saying-- All right, well, it is two days before our broadcast day as I record this. Our entire staff is on mic, plus contributors David Rakoff and Sarah Vowell in New York. Hello, all. And now for the results. I am opening the envelope. Wow, that's fascinating. Wow, that's just incredible. OK, among the men, Rakoff is number one and has like twice the amount of testosterone of anybody in the group. Oh, everybody's trying to get in with him now that he's number one. Then in order, the men are-- it's Rakoff, then Alex at number two, then me, like a point behind you, Alex, then Jonathan, and then Todd, all very closely grouped together. As any of us, the gay, Canadian Jew living in Manhattan. Rakoff is 274. You were at 144. I'm one hundred fort-- Alex, you touch-- The people on our staff who scored low are feeling rather-- they're feeling terrible about it. What should I say to them? Now, when you tried to convince him that he shouldn't feel bad about it, did he find that persuasive at all? So you were scared about anti-Semitism there. What did you find? Now, you brought tapes of this. Here's a recording recorded in the nightclub. Just describe this nightclub. We should say to people who have never been to a Jewish wedding, this is the old-school, dance at a bar mitzvah, dance at a wedding kind of song. And Krakow is how close to Auschwitz, the concentration camp? Right, because there are these clues all around, and they feel like, oh, finally, that's what that means. And now? Erin, what's this recording of? And they're non-Jews. These people in the crowd, just to be clear, are non-Jews. Give your best understanding of how this trend came about. How did this happen? A movie about the Jews. Now, one of the pieces of tape you've brought in that you recorded there is with the owner of a bookshop? The Jewish cafe. And how are you feeling about this, as a Jew whose family had to flee Poland in the Second World War? I wonder if the feeling you're feeling is something that happens to other groups a lot. I would imagine that an older black person visiting the House of Blues, which is, if I understand right, mostly white-owned and white audiences there walking in with a kind of kitschy presentation of black music. Right, after we've driven them off the land. You brought in another clip of tape from your interviews in Poland, a woman named Eva? So for her, does Jewishness connote a simpler, more innocent time? And how strange that the time that it connotes is 1930s eastern Europe. It's funny how being gone can make it magical and mystical. Was it just that the people who you were getting to know were fascinated by Jewish culture, or were they actually looking for their own Jewish roots? Was there a sense of, oh, maybe I'm part Jewish? So as somebody who actually is Jewish, when you would explain to people that you're actually Jewish, was it suddenly like you were a celebrity? That's such a weird variation on "some of my best friends are Jewish." "Some of my grandmother's best friends were Jewish." Do you think it's possible for Poles to honor Jews in a way that wouldn't feel a little bit creepy or disturbing to Jews? In every negotiation, the way you see it now is, somebody's going to be the sucker. No longer $3,800. That was a $2,000 profit. You paid $200 for it at Loehmann's. Now, your daughter Jen is sitting in the studio with you. Jen, do you just want to give your perspective on this, what this was like growing up with this happening all the time? How often will you do something like this? Will you have something like this going, say, once a week or so? What else has your mom done that you could never see yourself doing, when it comes to these kinds of things? And then, what are you saying to him to-- And will you just keep going until they give you what you want? Or will you stop at some point? And so your method is you just don't stop. For you, it's not about the money. It's just that it's like a sport for you, right? Jen, do you sort of go too far in the other direction? You'll pay double. I can't tell, hearing you talk about this, do you wish you were more like your mom? That's so computer-like. Now when she's saying this to you, do you have to type that in, so the daughter knows that she's saying it to you? Give another example of times it was hard just to be an information machine. And at the end of that, so now you as a person, you've been through this experience with him of now, the two of you have told a half dozen people that he's gone deaf. It must be hard that after you get off the phone with the last person, that you and he don't talk about what just happened. That's a standard shot? You've seen that a lot? Big. The beach figures bigger into our home movies than into our lives. So when there are kids in the films, they're cute and they're little and they're happy. And you're in a rec room or something. When you watch this as an adult, whose side are you on? Because I have to say, everybody else in the room is just trying to have fun, and there you are, baby Cecil B. DeMille. So at some point, you actually get your hands on the movie camera, when you're 10 or 11. And you start filming all the time, right? And what would it mean to be in one of these films? What would it mean to get a big part in one of these films? And would kids vie for parts in the films? You know what it's like, though? It's like, a little kid decides to become a director. And then, not only do they have films to show for it, but their personality becomes like a movie director gone power crazy. --is also so like the real Hollywood. When you look back on that, do you feel a little embarrassed? What are you thinking about? Right. So he's wearing this leotard with lip marks all over it. One of the things I think is so funny about Gay as a Whistle is that as soon as the boys are turned into gay, the way that they express it is that they yell the words, "Roses." And did you feel like the film was about you? Or was it even that conscious? Did you think of yourself as gay back then? What weird about it is that it's simultaneously gay-loving and homophobic at the same time. I am an actor. I noticed you don't list Darren in that little list. You also made a musical called I Have No Friends. And you had no friends? Right, and everybody hit adolescence. And you're the gay-seeming kid. Outside the group, you mean. You've, as an adult, made two feature films, one called Jawbreaker, one called Sparkler. Did you feel that you had more freedom to express yourself when you were 11 and 12 making movies? And when somebody has a video of, for example-- I've seen videos on the show of somebody trying to change a lightbulb and then a mishap happening. How do you explain the fact that they're filming the changing of a light bulb? And is it your impression that there are a lot of people out there filming all the time? Aha. Now, that's very interesting. What's the tip off that it's a set up? What are the tricks? How can you tell? I never would have thought of that. Does everybody's family seem the same, when you watch one of these videos after another? Who will make that joke. Do you guys shoot home videos? Right. A wedding just seems like a series of possible accidents waiting to happen.  Now, Candido, are there stories that you tell over and over?  What happens in this story? Yeah, tell me the story.  Oh my God.  Wait, she calls out from the audience?  I have to say, as a symbolic moment, it's a good one. Because something cute has suddenly become deeply un-cute.  What are you talking about? Everyone finds penguins cute.  It would be like a teddy bear biting you or something.  Do what animal bit John?  OK, that's not right.  Nope, it's not a pig.  Nope. Not the pig.  You barely have this story. You barely know this story.  Have you noticed that there's certain people that all the stories they tell, they are triumphant, and then other people, all the stories that they tell about themselves, they are humiliated.  When I was talking to him about it, I asked him, why is this the story that gets told over and over? And he said, that a really good story like this should be something where the person telling the story both appears as a hero and then as an idiotic fool.  Do you believe her, that you weren't in it?  Wait, wait, and he'll tell it, and in his version, he's in the story?  Robert?  If the story about Jackie Kennedy is true, you be able to tell me what she was wearing.  OK, you were too far away to see that. Mm hm. And when you've gone to the administration, and when the committee has posed these questions, what have they told you all? Now, the intelligence community concluded in October that if we attack Saddam Hussein, if he's cornered, then he'd be likely to use his weapons of mass destruction, his chemical or biological weapons, on troops, on neighboring countries, or here in the United States. And it's that last possibility we wanted to talk to you about. It's of particular concern to Senator Bob Graham from Florida. And he had a question or two he wanted us to ask you. First of all, do you all have a different assessment of the consequences of cornering Saddam Hussein? Do you agree that he might strike here in the US if we start winning the war? Sure. And is it the assessment still of the Office of Homeland Security-- do they agree with the intelligence community, back in October, that if we in fact do go to war, and if in fact we start winning, then the threat is greater here at home? But if one is to take this intelligence assessment seriously, what do you want us to walk away from this with, those of us who've read this in the paper or have heard about this? Do you want us to believe, OK, if we go to war with Iraq, you guys have us covered? We don't need to worry? Or do you want us to think, if we go to war with Iraq, OK, we should all understand we're in a little bit more danger here? And how confident is the Department of Homeland Security that it could stop any threat? That does not sound very reassuring. When I talked to Senator Graham, he raised this possibility. He wondered if it was the administration's position that you're prepared to accept whatever the consequences will be here in the United States, that it's more important to the country to eliminate Saddam Hussein, and that if some people should die in US cities as a result, well, we don't have a choice. That's the cost of war. Right. But is it-- Well, he was wondering if that was the administration's policy. Is it? And how's the War on Terror going? Are you worried? Are you frightened by the focus on Iraq at the expense of Al Qaeda? She was a US ambassador in the region that-- I saw in something you wrote that you quoted some of his generals, who said the reason why chemical and biological weapons weren't used during the Persian Gulf War was precisely because he had been warned, and he didn't want to allow for retaliation. And we know this through his speeches, through-- In your view, did deterrents work when the United States warned him against using chemical or biological weapons during the Persian Gulf War, and then it turned out that he didn't? Wait. What are the terrorist attacks you're talking about? Now, how do we know this? How do we know he thinks this? Technical means, means listening in, spying in various ways? And why isn't Saddam in the same position, though, that the Soviet Union would be? If he were to use his nuclear weapon, he knows the United States would just come in and blow him up? And just so I understand the logic that would be behind what Saddam is thinking, his thinking is the United States would be faced with this choice: Are we going to drop a bomb on Baghdad and kill hundreds of thousands of people? And the United States, when faced with that choice, would blink. We wouldn't want to do that? I have to say, in a way, I feel like I understand that. It is hard to imagine the United States dropping a nuclear bomb on a city right now. Because the student groups would see, oh, look, there's been change in Iraq. We want a more secular society, more modern society. I feel like everything you're saying, at some point or another during the last six months, I've read in a kind of shorthand. And I feel like this is the first time I'm hearing somebody lay the whole thing out: This is why we're going to war. How expensive was she? So how long did it take you to pay off the bird? And what did you love about her? What was the thing that drew you to her? And so at breakfast, you've got three little kids there. Now let's play a recording of Gideon for people at home. It sounds very dinosaur-like. The word you just use was "intolerable"? But you've lived with this sound for 23 years. Now, you taped little interviews with your kids about Gideon. Here's Cameron, who's five. This is Kyle, the other twin, also five. And is that because Gideon is in fact a little dangerous? They're right to be a little scared? Now, after your kids were born, and you saw how Gideon reacted to your children, and you saw how your children reacted to Gideon-- they were scared that Gideon bit Kyle-- did it change your feelings about Gideon? But if I had a dog that I loved, and you know, then I had a new baby in the house, and the dog was hostile towards the baby, I wouldn't feel the same way about the dog. You know, like I would feel protective of my kid, which I'm sure you did. Do you think the fact that you nearly died trying to save Gideon is one of the things that makes it impossible for you to give Gideon up? You say that "it brought us closer," but you're the only one who actually understands that you went out and you got injured trying to save Gideon. Gideon doesn't understand that.  Wait, wait. Literally, the report from the paper? How many of the people in the personals do you know personally, have you talked to yourself? Dozens. 15 ads like this. Did you ever see him? Cute? And she's driving or you're driving? The one syllable C word or three syllable C word? And what are you thinking at this point? Are you somebody who gets in a lot of fights? And are you thinking, at this point, what am I doing? It's so crazy to think about what experiences you have that will be the memories that stick with somebody as their most precious memories. For your mom, this is one of her most precious memories? I wonder if you're embarrassed because you're secretly proud. You got him? And Anthony, before we start, I want to do a quick rundown of some of the words that are going to appear here and there during the readings so nobody gets lost. Give me just quick definitions to these. Ruck. Dope. Or intelligence? Freqs. That's F-R-E-Q-S. A grand. STA. That's S-T-A. It appears all through this story. I hope this next one isn't too naive. Click. This is one that I feel like I've seen in a million war movies and they always say, go three clicks over, or five clicks over. And I've always wondered, how far is a click? I was talking to an Israeli who told me that he remembers being taught in school as a kid. The teacher said, the Israeli army went from village to village and begged the Arabs to stay. Please stay. Please be our neighbors. Did that happen in places? So how is it that living on that kibbutz with the village always standing there by the beach where you were going to swim, how was it that you didn't think about it all the time, oh, we took this from other people? But Rabin wrote it himself in his biography. That's funny, like there's a part of you that kind of believes the storybook version. It seems that you're put into the position though, where as a historian, in a way, you're endorsing the government officially denying part of the truth of its own history? It's your building? Like, if it were me, I would think like, are they here right now? In the building? So wait a second. So the camera goes inside this apartment, and you see your apartment, basically. A half-wall with brick, glass blocks? She ditched him because of the apartment? Wait. he lost out on The Bachelorette because of the apartment? And it was your apartment-- So this isn't just, like, people from outside New York. What was it? So Neil Chesanow, do you have a copy of your book, Please Read This For Me, there with you? Perfect. Can I ask you to open up just to the opening page of the preface to read from the preface? Let me just read some of these titles to give people a sense of what some of these are like. Page 111, "It's time to admit you don't have a drinking problem. You're an alcoholic." Page 82, "You act like Cary Grant in public and Archie Bunker at home." Page 134, "I think about marriage all the time." Page 148, "Maybe I'm not ready to have a baby." Page 136, "You'd probably prefer if I were an orphan." Let me ask you to read the one on page 135. Let me ask you to read another one. Let me ask you to read on page 105. For a civilian watching this coverage today, I have to say, I feel like, oh, I'm right there. It feels so real. For you watching this coverage, does it all seemed fantastically fake? Now you brought along a recording of some of the things you taped off TV. Let's just play one of those. This would be an example of one of those moments that you find to be completely fake. You've written about how you and the other Marines during the Persian Gulf War who you were with were told to say pretty much next to nothing to reporters. Keep everything positive. You were given little scripts to say. When you watch the interviews that are now being broadcast on TV, do you feel like you're seeing soldiers spinning the way that you were trained to? Can you think of any particular moment where you've seen somebody talking and you thought, yeah, that's right. That's just the line we give them. Calling gas meaning somebody said gas is incoming and so put on your gas gear. Did that automatically mean you knew that there was trouble? Had you served in the Iran Iraq war? In that war of course, an incredibly bloody war, estimates of the dead range up to 1.5 million. Iraq used chemical weapons in the war. Could you talk about what it felt like to know that you were being called up again to fight in this conflict for somebody who you didn't support? That is your-- Oh, so you were very lucky? Did they have the same kinds of feelings about Saddam that you did, that they didn't like the regime? Talk about the air strikes. Could you talk about what that was like? You were in Baghdad when the US started its 38 day air campaign against Iraq. Take a second. And you were with your three year old boy. Did he ask why are they bombing all of us if they're just trying to get this bad man? Was there a part of you which hoped that the Americans would succeed and liberate Iraq from Saddam Hussein. And what did you think about the United States at that time? Did you hate the United States for the bombing? Did you feel a mix of feelings about it because you hoped that they would come in? And were you also angry at Saddam for putting you all in this position? And then Ulysses comes on from the other side. And he's there on a mission to basically kill a little boy who the Greeks don't want to grow up and become a leader who will start a war against them. So he's on this sort of preventive war mission. And when he shows up, he's using language like, "You have to give him over to us. He threatens the peace. His life is a danger. We cannot allow it to continue to undermine the entire region's collective security." I have to say reading the text of this, what's most striking is how sad Ulysses is to have to do it. He's the one who has to go out and get the kid from the kid's mother. It's interesting. As the whole discussion goes on when finally she gives the boy over to him, and then says goodbye to him, she pretty much admits that he's right. That if he left her [INAUDIBLE] And lead them to victory. So this goes on, this discussion. The play proceeds. And then when the Greeks finally kill the little boy-- one of the things that's interesting reading it is that they are just as wrecked about it as the Trojans. So let me ask you to read the speech. A messenger comes in, reports on what has happened.  Right. But if you and so many other people in Congress believe that we should not have a deficit, why not just vote against this budget with this deficit?  Yeah, yeah, we know you love us, yeah.  And in comparison, when the new husband, the new wife showed up, there hadn't been books about that. People didn't know what to do with that.  Mommy, the name that carries more meaning than anything for a child. I will grant you that name, congratulations.  How long after the parents are re-married, how long do people say that it took before the new person seemed like something other than an invading army?  So it could be like a decade? It could be, like literally, until they were done growing up?  They never they really accepted their hearts like, this is our new family, this is the new person in our family?  Oh right, of course, because one of the things that they are, is not just your new parent, but they're basically a competitor for your other parent. Was your step-dad the kind of person who launched like a hearts and minds campaign to win you all over and be super sweet to you, and do stuff with you and all that?  Brilliant.  And you still didn't accept him until you moved out?  Now this is from your book, a novel in pictures and words, called Clumsy. It's 200 pages long, and every page is pretty much some moment of you adoring her.  Was she when one of your first girlfriends or your first girlfriend?  And so how long after you broke up were you still drawing the comic book?  So for two and a half weeks, you're basically drawing her face over and over and over again.  So you've agreed to adapt some of these to read over the radio. I should say to listeners who are listening with children, you do refer to sex, the fact that sex occurs, not with a lot of explicitness. So let's hear it.  After you broke up, what's the strip you wrote immediately after? What's the next one?  OK, why don't you read that?  Is there a part of going back and drawing and then having these moments which is partly about just figuring out what went wrong?  Read more.  Did friends tell you afterwards though, that these are experiences we've all had?  You're disappointed that it's so universal?  Read another. Our American women are just too soft. And looking--? There's the splashing of water.  And how did that work?  You hadn't spoken with anybody at all for two weeks? For two weeks you hadn't had a conversation with another person? Yeah that sounds good. Now sometimes you have your friend Matt come on and-- Dan is an irritating character. Yeah. I love how part of the formula of having a fantasy radio show is that you have a fantasy person who hates your guts. I wondered if you're more like a real radio personality or shock jock, where that's a thought that, actually, you only half believe that. But your views aren't quite as extreme as you're saying in the recording. So that people wouldn't know that you had eaten these things? At his insistence? So you had to build this room? And so this room essentially is to simulate Irving? Other examples besides Madonna and the internet? Pretty big, iconic ones. Just to give people a sense of the range of things that different parasites do, could you tell the story of the parasite that gets into ants, the lancet fluke? And what's the advantage to the parasite for the ant to be up there? What's so amazing about that is not just the control that the parasite is having over the ant. That life cycle that you're describing is so complicated. It's having to go through three different animals over the course of its normal life cycle. It's really hard to talk about without ascribing an intentionally to them, which they don't have consciousness. They don't have brains in any way. It's hard for us to even understand what they're doing without putting that on them. And it seems like all the parasites break down into two different groups. There are the kinds that actually get inside a host and then kill it off in their drive to survive in there. And then there are others, which actually just live inside and are happily living inside forever. They want the host to survive. Could you just tell the example of the creature that eats the fish's tongue? Some of these stories just are such gross out stories on a visceral level. You write, "parasitologists tend to fall in love with the parasites they study." Talk about one of the ones that you fell in love with. You write that it's the most monogamous couple on Earth. Thinking about this as much as you have, do you start to see everything as being parasites? Is one side winning? The parasites have the upper hand? I know but we know about them. They don't know about us. We're the ones with the brains and the thinking and the consciousness. Mr. Zimmer, whose side are you on? Because Mr. Zimmer, at some point we're all going to have to choose sides in this war. Speaking for the other humans, I want to say you're either with us or against us. Wait a second. Are you saying this because they could sense that you are in league with them? Well, no, let's just think for a second. There must be something you can do with that gum. But there is no drama. No, look. Hold on. I'll put that music under you right now. Right. At elementary school, there's swapping cards. And is your feeling of the noose sort of slowly tightening around your neck rising with each present? Afterwards, what would you feel when you would see her in the jacket? Would you feel good, or would you feel-- Every single time she wore it. Well, you don't know. Maybe she's got a story like this too. Maybe she's-- [? when you told ?] her-- she could be, oh yeah, well, really? Well, there's this is one thing I've ever told you. What kind of impression did this David Rudder make on you when you first met him? Any country details, you mean like-- David Rudder, or Special Agent Schweickhardt, had he done undercover work before? How early on does Rudder send George to go and talk to the Teamsters? So he flies you to California, right? Had you ever been flown anywhere on business? Does he meet you at the airport?  No computer? It's amazing. Because from the FBI's point of view, this movie is still never going to be made.  Why? What was his vision of how this could go? Like, what was going to happen if they made this into a movie? Wow. When George is talking to him about the movie, does he ask him, like, well, do you have any name actors attached to this? Does he ask him the basic questions? I know. They seem so random. But no, Dennehy is perfect in a way. Because you've heard of him, but you just don't think he'd be that hard to get.  Really, you think actually, we could get her on the phone. In a way, it's brilliant. It's perfect. That part of it is actually like perfectly well thought through. Schweickhardt works for the federal government. Like, what kind of undercover man is he that he doesn't know, well, if you deposit more than $10,000, it shows up in reporting? Like, I know that just from watching TV. How serious does it get? Do they start auditioning actors? Like, are there name actors who are showing up for this? That's actually a statement of intent. That's a contract, right there. So at what point do they finally pull the plug? Aww. And what was it like, being one of those girls? Yeah. And the mean one. Wait, they just put you put on hold? So you just sit there on hold waiting for them to come up with the next mean thing? It made no sense. She'd been there four years, longer than anybody, knew the menu better, gave very quick service, and on the niceness scale, here's the word Troy uses to describe Amy. On Sunday, Amy worked again. And this time, Amy says, her attitude was different. And what happened to your tips? "Now I know what to do." Not be as nice?  OK, table five you were sucking up to like I've never seen. So that's just a little over 15%. Wow. Wow. He tips $5-- Does he ever actually say, you know, how could you do this to me? You know, you kicked me out? And because letters took more work, people would make sure they said something. So that means that you're personally picking up seven tons of garbage a day? That seems crazy. Because it just doesn't seem like a person can even pick up-- So how many months did it take before you were able to lift comfortably, and at the end of the day, you weren't wiped out? I know, but it's nice to not have to think about those things. I know. But just riding around with you, just this little bit, I just feel like, God, people have a lot of crap. So Sal just instinctively just gives you a cover. Now he's accusing you of following him. Did you guys follow him after you left the place? In this tape, you sound a little bit nervous. You can hear your voice shaking. You can hear you breathing while he's talking. Man. How much danger was the Benedetto family putting itself in to let you all do this? Let me play you a little clip of tape. Now, this is very hard to hear. It's going to be hard to hear over the radio. Let me just play a little clip. And basically, he's just whispering to you. One of these tapes you got, this guy named Ed Tamley actually names Vincent Chin Gigante. How significant is it for somebody to name the Chin on tape? So in the end, what do you say that finally convinces him? And what he's saying to you? Was he a big guy? Like pee on the floor. Like just kind of very quietly pee on the floor. No one will know. Right.  He's looking for something to do.  Was it intimidating, the glaring?  Yeah.  So if he was just driving through this alley, that wouldn't constitute a violation.  Why?  And what'd they say?  Hm.  See I wonder, even if you all had enforced all these things-- the level of punishment that Curt Thompson would have gotten would have been pretty minimal.  And so in the end, would it have actually forestalled a big tragedy happening like what happened?  It's interesting to hear. Like you feel very confident that if lines had been drawn early on, it would never have gotten to this point.  You think aggressive action would have had the opposite effect from what the mayor is saying?  You think aggressive action actually would have set him off?  Wow, people actually said this to you?  In the story that you wrote, you tell the story at one point of the town of Skidmore, Missouri in 1981. And they faced a similar kind of figure, a guy named Ken McElroy, who got into all sorts of feuds. Talk about what happened in that case.  It's funny, the idea of, you know, we should look out for each other, we should be each other's keeper. We usually think of it as driving us towards acts of kindness. You know when somebody's sick, when somebody's in trouble. It's odd to think of it as being an impulse that would actually drive a group of people to kill somebody.  Let me ask you to compare his personality with Ashley's personality.  He's boastful and vain.  Right. And the rationale for that is what?  It freaks him out, though-- you don't like him to know that perhaps some birds are, in fact, eaten?  I've been informed that the only way that I can reach him is by calling your mom and speaking to Yona Lu? Do I have that name right?  Yona Lu.  Yona Lu is?  Anything special that I should say to Yona Lu to make this happen?  Hey, Mrs. Mattoon?  It's Ira Glass.  Mrs. Mattoon, here's why I called you. I want to do a little story on the radio about Duki.  Duki.  And that I needed to do that through you.  Who is Yona Lu.  Well, I don't know, actually. I mean, we--  Well, so what do I do now? I'm calling-- I was told to contact you if I wanted to get in touch with Yona Lu in order to book Duki. What do I do next?  That's the whole idea. I want to book Duki for the show for an interview.  Would Yona Lu want to discuss terms or something?  So what's going to happen? All right. Should I call you back?  You'll just go in and check?  Should I wait?  All right, I'll wait.  Yeah.  Yeah.  It's just radio.  No, no one's going to be on TV. No, it's strictly radio.  What if it were TV?  Really?  Yeah. That period that you're describing, when do you mean?  And they would only communicate through the duck?  And how long did this last?  What percentage of your relationship with your sister is based on your relationship with Duki?  Is Duki still up for this?  He just got back from a party?  All right. Well, could you get him?  OK.  Hey, Duki?  I'm just fine.  Long time no see back at you. And welcome to our little radio program.  Well, we actually have a number of different people.  They're just like Tom Cruise.  Now, Duki, I was talking to Danielle for our radio program and had her come on and talk about you a little bit. And one of the things that she said was that when she was younger, in order to discipline her if she was doing something that you didn't like, you could pretty much control her with something called nose squeaks.  Of Danielle?  And would she move?  Now, if Ashley would tell her, if Ashley would sit down on the couch and say to Danielle, "move the pork," what would the effect of that be?  Yeah.  Is there anything about the life of a duck that perhaps you could tell our radio audience that we might not know? I'm sure that you know much more about it than we do.  You're not in touch with the whole scene, yeah.  The first one looked regal, but now you've just turned to one where it almost looks like-- it's like a clown. it looks comic.  Oh, my God. That chicken does look like Phyllis Diller.  What do you guys think of the pictures?  See, to me, what's so interesting, though, is that the Standard of Perfection doesn't include a personality.  And so is that a pose that the owners would want to own a photo of?  Maybe we should explain what that is. What does that mean to bring a pull-it?  For real? The chicken-- the rooster will show off more for a hen that it doesn't know?  Why? What did she just do? Describe--  But not Standard of Perfection.  Do you get frustrated with the Standard Of Protection sometimes?  I thought that's the whole point of a standard, is that--  And when you're raising these birds, with any of these birds, do you have a close relationship with a bird the way some do [UNINTELLIGIBLE] with a pet?  What did you do? What do you do?  Wait a second. You're saying that you were diagnosed with cancer, and this is the only treatment you've had, and it cured you?  And you make it into tea or something like that?  She is big. This is a chicken like the size of a dog.  A small dog.  Do you feel like your relationship with chicken has changed because of this?  How could that not be so?  You eat chicken while you're standing there with a chicken?  Well, no wonder they won't sit still. And had you called on December 31? [CHUCKLES] [LAUGHING] In the hospital with what? Wait. You mean, literally, like, they can't get two people on the phone at the same time and conference them? They're a phone company though. Like, they sell that service. OK. So you call MCI. Wow. The phone company made you cry. How? And who's Chuck Carter? No. He says, literally, breathe? And is there a part of you which feels like, don't condescend to me? Or are you just eating it up? But how could they run a business where they can't call their own employees one by one? Like, how does Chuck Carter's wife reach him to say, like, pick up some milk on the way home? Right. OK. So this goes on for weeks and weeks. And so somewhere there's an office. They're saying that there's an office where there's only a fax machine. What is this employee's name? Let's say her name over the radio. Do you hate what this has reduced you to? Really? And so right now you're just waiting to hear from the geniuses in the silo? So Julie, now weeks have passed since that first conversation, the one that we just heard. And so you've had time to hear from the geniuses in the silo. What's the word? So who are we calling today? All right. Well, let's go to it. Let me just say, before we place this call-- Julie? You're in luck because you're about to see the power of the national media. The power that public radio has in this country. We're going to place this call, we're going to say who we are, we're going to indicate that they're on the record, and doors are going to open. Your problems will be solved. Are you are you being serious or are you being sarcastic? All right. Well, let's find out. So we call, and some automated system picks up, asks us to punch in some answers to a few questions, which takes over two minutes. And then we get a customer service rep. I'm sorry, you said Ferdie? Hi. My name is Ira Glass, and I'm recording this for possible national radio broadcast. I work on a national radio show. One of my coworkers-- her name is Julie Snyder-- has an ongoing problem with her bill. Julie? I don't know. Thanks so much. Hi. And I should tell you-- we told Ferdie this, we're recording this for a possible national radio broadcast on public radio. Why not? OK. I will stop recording the call. Hi, Jim Myers. Now, one of the things that we need you to respond to is this. Over the course of her calls, Julie talked to a service representative named Melanie Gladwell who told her that she had to contact the complaints division in Iowa. And she said that they don't have a phone number. That she couldn't call the complaints division to straighten out the problem. They only have a fax machine. Do you have a complaint office in Iowa City that doesn't have any telephones, but only a fax machine? No, Melanie is a supervisor. All right. What's your email address? All right. All you MCI customers, you heard it. Let's give that one more time, the e-mail address? M-Y-E-R-S? OK. No, here we are. Like, do you want to say? Are we being suckers? Yeah. Christmas is coming, baby. Two days after we talked to Jim Myers, Julie received a huge gift basket from him at her house filled with chocolate treats and fancy cheeses and gourmet crackers and a very nice note. And with that, she no longer wanted revenge. For 10 months, the worst thing, the most infuriating thing, was that she was trapped in an impossible situation where there was no court of appeal. As an individual you can't even sue the phone company for all your lost time and your mental anguish. And then, she found the thing all of us always yearn for in this situation. She found a higher judge who could fix it. That's right. I'm Ira Glass. Back next week with more stories at This American Life.  Of all these things that you have in this basket, what do you think is the most likely to get returned?  Like criminals. Wait, so you get the room?  The White House Press Secretary.  The actual White House Press Secretary.  Wait, wait. These are the two pieces of advice they give you? Piece of advice number one is, don't get yourself shot? Like, that's--  Now, wait, wait. Now when you say this to a bunch of real activists, "I've always wanted to be one of the Old Testament prophets," is that pretty much where they roll their eyes and slowly shake their heads and look at the ground? They just think, "Oh, what have we gotten ourselves into here?"  Now Charles, can we just pause the story right here--  And let's move to the present, a dozen years later. Now, when you think about that quote now, as the adult you are, how do you view that quote now?  Wait. Have you ever-- you've lived in the United States of America, right?  Are you familiar with how people feel about the ripping in half of the American flag?  But weren't you trying to win the sympathies of your countrymen?  Well, let me stop you right there. Because we have here in the studio a videotape of this day, July 8, 1992. We got this courtesy of the Vanderbilt University Television Archives. And you have never seen this?  OK. Let's roll the tape.  Now, he's barely spoken for a half minute. He's still in his opening statement.  Now the camera's panning back.  You can't hear it all. You can't hear it at all. All you hear is the president.  This is the tape. I don't think anybody heard it.  So the President gives this little nervous laugh and sort of looks down, and then he goes on with his regular statement.  And this continues for a few minutes.  So you're sitting down.  Well, what do you mean why-- What he was saying was perfectly reasonable. "I'll get to you during the question-- look, we're going to talk, and it's going to be during the question and answer period. I'm just reading my opening statement." How are you going to argue with that?  Because from your point of view, the whole point was to get arrested.  So now at this point, you've failed.  So finally it comes to you. You're the third question. And basically, he answers two questions, and then he says this.  Then you said, "Do you respect the flag?"  And then you say, "It's all rhetoric." And then the president sort of laughs. And then there's the voice of Sam Donaldson. And then now, it's back to normal.  And what would doing a better job have meant? What do you wish that you would have said?  But what could that possibly be?  Yes, but it's--  It seems very unlikely in this setting.  I don't know. When I see the president answering questions at a news conference, I feel like what he's doing is-- he doesn't want to say anything that's going to get him in trouble. He doesn't want to say anything that's going to make his life more complicated and difficult. And it's not an environment conducive to learning.  But of course, you didn't come up with what you should have said because nothing could have been said--  In that setting that was going to make the President of the United States rethink anything in particular.  Now, you're in your thirties now. Have you ever had this experience where somebody just yelled something at you, some punk kid, whatever, yelled at you?  Did it keep you up at night afterwards? Did it give you something to think about?  And so do you think, thinking about George Bush and the possibility that he would be kept up at night a moment like this--  I don't mean to embarrass you for this thing. It happened 15 years ago. But let me just read the exact quote so people listening on the radio will know what we're talking about.  You were asked why were you holding a fundraiser in Baltimore, and you said, "It helps educate my constituents as to why Baltimore needs the economic help. I mean, Baltimore is a goddamn ghetto. It's worse than inner-city Washington, DC. It is [BLEEP]." They beeped out the words like we're doing. And then you say, on tape, apparently, "I hope you're not going to play this on tape." And you laughed, and then you said, "I mean, it's a war zone. I mean, it's crack. I mean, it's dime bags of PCP. 1/4 of every kid is not in school each day. 50% of the kids that start out in school don't graduate. So looking at things from a statewide perspective, we really have to do things to help."  But you didn't know they were actually rolling film?  Wow.  So when something like this happens, is this just like a bomb going off? Does everything turn over in a minute?  Wow.  Man, I've got to say, that's a bad number when--  When the doorman of the hotel is consoling you.  This is at 4:00 in the morning?  You mean going back and giving your side of it?  Yeah. Now, this happened on a night of an exploratory fundraiser for statewide office. What effect did this have on your career when you look back?  This must have been one of those moments you ended up thinking about a lot afterwards, right?  And what would you think? When you replay it in your head, what would you think about it?  Did you find that you were more careful in what you were saying afterwards?  And I saw that a couple years ago, in 2001-- that's 12 years after this happened-- the Baltimore papers did a big profile of you, a very flattering profile summarizing your legislative career. And this is one of the things that they mentioned. Not in a big way, but just as one of the things that had happened in your career. Is it dispiriting feeling like you're just never going to shake this, you know what I mean? When you retire, it's going to be there? In your obit, they're going to mention this in passing?  And this is the thing I was really curious about is when you came back, did your regular life seem kind of stupid?  When did you find something that was as intense as the military to replace the military?  God made The Rangers winners.  What was her argument?  Wait a second. You actually thought that, if you drove instead of walked, that God would actually make the team lose? That would be His revenge on you, really?  So let's walk from New Jersey into Manhattan, literally?  Across the bridge.  Take that. And a milk.  I never thought about it. Like, this is the downside of having a personal relationship with God is that you'd constantly be bearing a grudge. I thought it was all just like reassurance and stuff from God all the time. He's there in times of need. I never thought you could actually just feel a grudge against him for something like this.  I realized that, as you said that, my image of God is exactly-- I could never put this together in my life-- is exactly my image of my father, but bigger, which is he's usually not around. Sometimes he'll take an interest. He means well, but mostly he's kind of like, you're on your own. Yeah. So you have this moment with the team. Does this actually have consequences past that week?  So this happened a decade ago. Have there been times that you missed being religious, having that life, having that community? Is there some part of it that you've missed along the way? David, um, this is the first day of your fast? Are you very, very hungry right now? Wow. It's taxing. Throw it out the window. Throw it out the window. [LAUGHS] You live on the first floor. Throw it out the window. Does it make you feel safer to have the banana there? Or is the banana taunting you? Like saying-- Have you started to feel superior?  And what harm does it do? For example, one of the fines that Howard Stern is facing from the FCC is for talking about or referring to anal sex on his show. If a child were to hear him refer to that, what harm does that do, specifically? How do you envision the harm of that?  Right. But if they don't understand it, then how does it actually hurt them?  You mean if they'll still be together.  Are they doing good or bad here? He could back off. He could de-escalate. Which are? She's smiling as she says it. And he smiles as he says that. He's looking down.  Because he's changing the subject. So how do you say it? But why wouldn't they just notice that same-sex means the same thing? I see. Well, I hope I'm not blowing your cover here by broadcasting this. But John, the gay couples and the lesbian couples that you're talking about-- they're simply as good as the very best couples in your heterosexual couples? Or you're saying they're even better than them? Really? Oh, my God. And saying, "You don't have the kind of body that I find attractive." In a way, the power of that comes from the fact that-- let's say the other side has their studies which argue one thing, and you guys have your studies that argue something else. You're saying, as long as your side is defendable, you win. And then when you opened him up, were you fully expecting you were going to still find some cancer? Your brother has a band? Oh, stop the tape for a second, Davy. We should say, your mom is deaf, but she can talk. And she reads lips, so whenever people hear you on these tapes you're talking really slowly and distinctly so she can read your lips, and you're also signing to her a lot of times, too. She still sings sometimes? Because she can't hear herself at all, right? So Davy, before you guys went to Brazil, what did you think was going to happen? Did you view this as, oh, my mom is going to be disappointed? Was there a part of you where you thought that she might get a miracle cure? Wait, and your mom's friend actually saw this happen with her own eyes? So Davy, where are we now? And this is the sort of place where the town's main industry is healing tourists? We should say to people who are trying to picture this that we're not talking about like, you just have dry skin, or red skin, that it's way more serious than that. So where are we now? So Davy, so I know that your mom hired a translator and a guide for you guys. Is she there with you during this part? You've incorporated King Solomon. What does that mean? And are these healers that we would have heard of? Are these, like, famous people? OK, so you guys are standing there in this big room with hundreds of people in this line. How long does that last? Current means like the current, the electrical current that comes from all the entities? Wait, wait. Surgery? You mean like, surgery surgery? Like, they cut into you? And you get the surgery, too? OK, so clearly at this point, you probably realize like, OK, your mom didn't get her hearing back. Did they warn you that it wasn't going to be like, OK, man puts his hands on you and, kaboom, you know, that suddenly you get your hearing back? But that it might take weeks or more? So in their view, is there like even room for coincidence? Or--? Yeah, just to remind people of how you've talked about this in the past, your mom channels this ancient being, Aaron. And the last time you came on the show and talked about it, you described it this way. You said that, basically you faced this choice as her kid. You could decide that channeling isn't real and your mom's a little crazy. And you don't think she's crazy. She's really wonderful in so many ways. And so you sort of provisionally were thinking, OK, well, maybe this is real. Aaron gives people advice? So it's like you're at a kind of showdown with her? So is there any point down there when you thought that you started to believe a little bit? So what's going on now? Oh, you mean like real surgeries? He does those, too? OK, so how's it go? You go in there with Cynthia and she's in there with him. What's he do? OK, I can feel where this is going. Let me just warn people, this might get a little graphic. OK, continue Davy. Oh my God. OK, and so what is she doing? Is she like screaming? Like, what's she doing? Then what happens? And so did you go and tell your mom? Like, what did your mom make of it? Oh, so there's room for the instrument? Everybody, that is, but you? You mean, for the two of you who are so close to say, we disagree on something that's so fundamental and such a big part of her life? So you started looking around, what'd you find? As compared with $47,000 per year? So you go, you fly to some foreign country, you get some doctor there, I guess, to prescribe the drug? Did you have to actually claim that you had a disease or did you just tell the doctor, here's my situation. And at this point, you're not exactly sure if it's legal to bring these back? So what do you do? And so this is like, dozens of pills or hundreds of pills? So you have hundreds of pills, what was the moment like when you finally were coming back into the country? And what do we know about how many people are actually going overseas and bringing back drugs? And is that legal or is that illegal? Do you know what the penalty would have been if you'd been caught? Now, at some point you learned that you might be able to simply order the drug from, what was it, an online manufacturer? Like an online pharmacy? And the reason for that law is because they can't vouch for the quality of the drugs? They haven't tested those drugs? But in a way, that's a legitimate thing. Like. In a way, you'd want the government to actually do that, to say, we have no idea if this manufacturer's reputable and the drug's OK. There's a passage in your article where you say, "I can go to Europe and buy their wine for less, go to Asia and buy their clothes for less. American companies can buy their raw materials for less overseas, or they can move their operations abroad in order to hire cheaper labor or management. But on a mind-boggling reversal of the American principle of supply and demand, I cannot purchase cheaper drugs and bring them home." And so the FDA holds this stuff up. How long do they hold it? And did you end up having to get the senator's office to intervene for you again? Like, every time it would come to the border, the same place, same people? Oh, I see. You had to say that the American version didn't work? Why, what happened? Now, that's a special program which lets you say, we don't have the money to pay the $47,000, so give us a break, basically, on humanitarian grounds? Oh, she said that to you straight out? Now, a few months after your dad died-- and we should say that he didn't die of the cancer, he ended up dying of heart failure-- Congress passed the Medicare drug bill, which was designed to address exactly this problem. If your dad had survived, what would this bill have done for him, which is supposed to, basically, take these expensive drugs and put them within financial reach of people? So is that good or bad, as far as you're concerned, getting it down to $6,000 to-- The thing you're talking about is actually that, under the bill, the United States government would not be able to negotiate for lower prices. They wouldn't be able to say, we're buying a huge quantity, so give us a price break? And as you note in your article, when the government buys anything in quantity, they negotiate the price down. And do you blame the drug companies for that? So what does everybody do? You just hold it in? And did you try to get them to just choose one problem? Yeah? How come? So he would stage breakouts? And was he quoting lines from the movies? Like would-- So what did you do? Like, they gave him more of the drug that didn't-- OK. So you guys try more drugs, and you try reasoning with him. Neither thing works. OK, so you remember this case, and? Right. Everything else has failed. And his reaction? So did he get better? Right. He was just as willing to see himself as himself at some point. Oh, it's interesting to think about that in a way, his problem was that he didn't know how to relate to the world. He had some sort of breakdown, and he didn't know how to relate. And so he just chose a way to relate that it was clear how to relate. If he's Arnold Schwarzenegger, if he's The Terminator, it's clear what his role is. And all he needed for somebody to do was give him a way to think about, no no, here's who you are, and here's how to interact with the world. How common is this as a technique to do with very extreme patients, though? This idea that you're going to enter their world in this way and enter their fantasy and just suggest a variation on the fantasy? Huh. So what does that mean? And do I understand right? You're saying that with these difficult cases, the problem isn't that people recognize, oh, this one's a stumper, and now I've got to do something different. The problem is that they actually don't recognize I'm failing in what I'm doing. I'm just doing it over and over, and it's not getting fixed. Is that what you all are calling yourselves these days, the youth? I'm taking notes here. Well, one of the things that your governor says is that a big part of the initiative is getting broadband access everywhere. Do you have-- That's just laughable to you, huh? Why is that funny to you? Do you personally already have broadband internet access? Hm. And so that's not doing anything to keep you in the state, huh? Let me just read to you a couple of sentences from your governor's state of the state address. "So the fourth way we will grow the economy is by spurring strong regional economies anchored by cool cities. We can have local commissions on cool. Government can't create cool. But we can and will target existing resources to support local efforts, to have vibrant cities." Do you find it disturbing to hear the governor say the word "cool" so many times? And basically, it just guides you as you're cutting the piece of wood, right? And so that's what it's supposed to do. What did this one do? So you came up with a totally ingenious solution for what to do this. You basically decided to sell it on eBay. Can I ask you to read from your listing that was posted on eBay? What I love about this is just how completely categorical it is. I'm going to ask you to read some of the next paragraph. Then you go on and you say that the best part of it is that it is a three-legged router table. All right. Keep going in the reading. And then you go on and you explain how to ship it and blah-blah-blah-blah-blah. And so it seems like it was the listing when you first sent it out. And then people started writing you. What kinds of emails were you getting? Right. And why don't you read the addendum that you added in mid-March based on this emails. And then the next day, apparently in response to other emails, you add the following. And then the next day, apparently, people are writing you about the bottle. So you had to make this addendum. So how many people looked at this site? So you have fans. Wait. Are you-- what did they say in the marriage proposals? So who bought the thing. Wait, wait, wait. He didn't want it? He just got caught up in the excitement? He didn't want you ruining his reputation. Wow. I can't believe you actually made money. Really? How rare is that ideal? Out of 300? And all the others said-- And they felt that way because why? So it's important that it's fair. It's not important that it's equal. She did? Really? What parts of the fortune would happen in what mood? And do you use their credit card? Wait. And she still gets the credit card bill, and then she goes, like, that Aimee? So basically, all your life, you've been haunted by this idea that you're really terrible with money and you're spending too much money. Can I just run something from the fortune by you? So we had a translator translate this, and we have some recordings of her, and then some parts of this I'm just going to read to you. It says right here, talking about characteristics, you are loquacious and disgruntled, which will cause you back pain. You will be a good treasurer-- which I think means good with money-- and quickly become a wealthy person. And then here's the translator. OK, Aimee. I have another clip of tape of the translator to play you. I hope you're ready for this. She is? Wait. Are you saying that you actually believe in the fortune?  And why? Why is that your best bet?  The odds won't be good enough. Do you think, from a kid point of view, when they saw the slippers, they just read them as fancy? That's what it was. The actual lingerie? What was it? Wait, a first grader gave her teacher or his teacher a thong and a tank top? Was it sexy? Or was it cotton, like, cute girl? And that's clearly something that the parents helped order, yes? The parents were in on that. It seems like that would be kind of an uncomfortable parent-teacher meeting after that. So what studies exist? What do we know about children and curse words, and what it does to them? Let me just read to you from the recent FCC decision about Bono using the F-word. FCC Commissioner Kathleen Abernathy said about the decision against using the F-word at the Golden Globes, she said "Today we take a strong stand against indecency on our public airwaves, and a significant step in protecting our children." What's your take on that? Has anybody studied the actual thing that the FCC is regulating, which is, what is the effect of seeing certain words or seeing certain things referred to on television and radio? What is the effect of that on children's development and behavior? The Commission in this decision said-- I'm reading from their decision-- "The F-word is one of the most vulgar, graphic, and explicit descriptions of sexual activity in the English language. Its use invariably invokes a coarse sexual image." The implication of this is that when Bono says F-ing brilliant, the five commissioners of the FCC actually are picturing penises and vaginas. "Its use invariably invokes a course sexual image." Is there any evidence that when people say F-ing brilliant, or use the F-word in this kind of way, that anyone else in America is picturing a coarse sexual image? Do you have any sympathy for the idea that there's a general coarsening of the culture that's happened, more graphic stuff on movies and television and on radio, and that that is not an entirely desirable thing? Wait, you're saying there's more civility now than there was 100, 200 years ago. Let's talk about the Golden Globes decision. And I understand that you can only talk about this to a limited extent, because you guys have a kind of appeal that's up in front of the Commission still, right? OK, just to review for people what happens in that case. Bono gets this award at an awards show. He uses the F-word. But the rationale is so strange. They're saying that the reason why it's important to do it is because the use of this word in any context invokes this coarse sexual image. And if you think about how it's used, for example, Pat Tillman, the football player who was killed in Iraq, his brother at a memorial service, saying, he's F-ing dead. So that clearly does not invoke a coarse sexual image for anyone. And so the premise of the ruling seems to be questionable. It's kind of a weird justification. Yeah, let's just explain what that is. That's a case where NPR had a wiretap of John Gotti, and used it in a news report-- this is back in the '80s-- and didn't beep out the F-word. And someone complained to the FCC. And the FCC said, no, no, no, it's OK in this context, because there's a clear news value to this. And you're saying that this decision did not overturn that? One of the things that's happening is that I think a lot of broadcasters are having to guess what's going to be OK under the law since the Bono ruling. Recently, another public radio show, Fresh Air, faced this decision where there's a singer named Nellie McKay who uses the word "suck" in a song, and not in a sexual connotation, more in a connotation like, that sucked, sort of thing. Yeah. And the producer of Fresh Air went to the lawyers for, you know, and they basically said, are we OK? And they said, absolutely not. That's just too risky. But on the other hand, not issuing a Red Book and saying-- it also does a kind of damage, because people are forced to guess and tend to-- they'll overreach, as in this case. When the decision says political, scientific, or independent value, could independent value also be literary value? That's funny, because there's a David Sedaris story that we ran on our show years ago, that takes place in a bathroom, that violates all three of the FCC criteria for indecency. It's explicitly graphic in talking about excretory activities, which is one of the criteria. He repeats and dwells on the descriptions at length, because he's trying to be funny. Can I play this for you? It's only two minutes long. And if at the end of it, you feel like, oh, you can't actually-- All right. Let me play it and then see if you have anything you can say about it. Here we go. Anyway. See, but I would argue this one on just straight-up literary merit. If you think about the mission of literature, it's to describe situations that we all can relate to and have had some feeling of ourselves, or can imagine having a feeling of. And that seems to be what he's doing. But also thinking about what the Supreme Court says, the Supreme Court says, well, another problem is teaching a kid a word. If we teach a kid a word, then that's a problem. But in this, I don't think any kid would be learning any words from this. And in fact, I have to say this is a little monologue that a seven-year-old would love. Well, so in a way, the best thing that can happen for the status of the law, and I sort of hate to say this, is that people would write in right now at your website, would go to www.fcc.gov and basically complain against me on this Sedaris thing. And that's the only way we would get a ruling that would define the law. Yeah, kind of a very femmy person. And so was there any kind of limit to your gayness? So that's seems like that would be kind of a problem. So how does somebody who feels that way come to think that they're gay in the first place? When Nancy had just gotten out of college, she moved into the city. Her parents were going through a bitter divorce. All her college relationships with boys had been disasters. That's how it felt at the time anyway. Right, you had heard stories about people like you where their relationships hadn't worked out and they were unhappy all the time. And it turns out they were gay. That was the problem. Do you remember the first step you took? People in New York and Chicago and Minnesota?  And that came about how?  Wait, wait, wait, wait. Again, I say-- now I know that that's the story that's told in your home and it's a family legend. But is that actually a believable story?  Again!  Again, I say that's a really great story that you guys tell each other. But first of all, detergent can't turn into rust, because detergent isn't actually metal.  Now, do you remember this look that your Uncle John and your mom passed between them?  And then after that, nothing else happens that day, no more fights, no more comment-- that's it?  I'm just biting my tongue here about that story-- about the underwear, about the actual truth of that story.  Well, sure. Sure, you're on a trip, like, sometimes you run out of underwear and you have to wash one out in the sink. But that's different than, you own one pair of underwear for a week long trip, and you just wash it out over and over because you're too cheap to buy more than one pair.  Again, again-- cupboards full.  OK, but anyway, your point stands. She was very cheap.  But the cheese. It just seems so crazy.  You know, when you say it like that, actually, I feel like I actually kind of understand it. Like the dream that she had-- I mean, she was right. Your mom and your uncle, they were laughing at her. Actually, she was sensing something that was real. And of course it made her feel really, really bad.  What's the role of this story in your family? Is this one of the ones that gets told over and over?  Oh wow. You're saying because of the cheese and the will, that's what leads to all the other stories.  What's so interesting is that if, in fact, she was doing this as an act of spite and to get the last word, it's so misplaced. Because of course you don't get the last word. The living absolutely get the last word in every possible way.  This is what I'm talking about. You start with one $10,000 bequest, and before you know it, people are saying that you only owned one pair of underwear.  Eddie Schmidt, and his mother and father, Josie and Bob Schmidt. Wasn't it more boring, doing nothing?  Did you have a book you were reading, where you could just kind of, sit in the back--  Yeah. Or a magazine, or something?  Right.  Or it's just sitting there and not working.  And when it comes to high school, will you work in high school?  In your job, do you deal with kids who don't show up at school? Can we just pause on that moment for a second? OK, so you're here to coach them about disciplining and controlling children. And in the middle of this, they say to you, oh by the way, you got our call about your son hasn't shown up today. What's that like for you?  At some points in this fight, did you find yourself kind of convinced by him?  So you're simultaneously proud of him, and completely flummoxed.  How'd that go over?  And did you say this in kind of an angry way? Or were you just as neutral--  And so she sends him down to the office. The focus room?  Meaning like, focus on what you had done?  The focus room.  Well there's no way to get out of any room besides the door. Oh, the window, I see what you're saying. [LAUGHTER]  Yeah.  You can't throw in the towel.  Now were you aware during this period that you were posing kind of a puzzle for your dad? Say a little more about that.  Was there like, a most satisfying moment of it? That you remember you just thought, like, yes, OK.  When?  Oh, you gave him a reward, if he would actually go to school.  Oh. A bribe.  I asked your dad how it was resolved. And he said he basically just tried to bribe.  That you got to come out to Chicago.  Well, he didn't-- yes.  That's pretty much, yeah.  And is that a bad thing?  See I disagree with you. I think that if you're getting people to do the right thing for the right reasons, it's always best. But if that fails, getting them to do the right thing for the wrong reasons-- that's life. Sometimes that's the way it's got to go.  I don't think it's the wrong thing to offer you the trip as a present.  Well what would you do? What should he have done?  See but, he wanted you to go to school. Like, he--  Why?  Because you felt like probably you would have been bored, you would have wanted to see your friends, it would just feel weird.  Wow. Did you realize this at the time, or did you only realize it in retrospect?  And so, what does that mean? What do you think you're going to be doing?  And Patrick, what do you find in that kind of situation, that tends to change people's mind?  And so, basically, you talk about your kid. You talk about going to church. Yeah, when he said that, again, I was just like, wow, I don't know if I've ever heard anyone say that, Democrat or Republican. You've never heard that. Wasn't it $16? Hilary asks. And so when you moved in, was there indoor plumbing? Was there electricity? Ira. You want to see everything? So what do you hope to get from George today? Do you want George to say something to talk him out of farming today? George, there was something that Hilary's wife was talking about it earlier. She was saying that he gets up too late in the day to be a farmer. Does it matter what time you get up? And what wasn't coming together? But you don't have to actually run a farm as a business to have that. What do you think is going to happen? And what do you think's going to happen? To the farm?  So Richard Perle and James Fellows. The question that we wanted to talk to the two of you about it is, once we decided to go to war, did the administration do a competent job in planning and executing it? Basically, how good are they at their jobs at conducting the war on terror.  Are there certain mistakes that you think were avoidable?  James Fallows, what's your take on this?  And just to be clear, James Fallows, you're saying in your reporting what you found is that the administration was warned specifically about this kind of looting and this kind of disorder starting, and yet didn't get control of the capital and didn't get control of the country.  But in a sense, I've got to say as a voter, to me it kind of doesn't matter if it should have been Iraqi forces or it should have been more American forces. I feel like all I see is that you both are saying we needed more troops on the ground to make the country more secure at the beginning, and it was one of the most important things that we could do. And that's led to that kind of problems that we're having now, and they get worse and worse and worse.  OK, how am I going beyond?  Let's move on to a different subject. One thing that's come up in the two debates is this question of letting Osama bin Laden get away at Tora Bora. It's been brought up in both of the debates so far. Neither the president nor the vice president actually responded directly to the charge. It seems really damning.  Richard Perle?  Richard Perle, you've been at the forefront of saying that we need to turn over Iraq to the Iraqis, and the faster we do it the better off everybody's going to be, and the more of a success this is going to be. I'd like to talk to you just about whether you're concerned at the speed at which that's happened. Back in July, there was a report that the US military put out, just explaining the progress in training Iraqi forces.  And is this something that you think that the administration, if it had decided to yell and scream about a little bit more and used the force of the power of the presidency more, could have done something about?  But that's an entirely Republican Congress and Senate.  Richard Perle, clearly you think that a lot of things have gone wrong. Do you think people should have been fired?  James Fallows.  James Fallows, you've written about national security professionals, most of them Republicans who you've talked to over the course of two years. I'm just going to read from one of your articles. You say, let me tell you my gut feeling, a senior figure at one of America's military-sponsored think tanks told me recently. In my view, we are much, much worse off now than when we went into Iraq.  James Fallows?  Just to give people a sense of the range of things that different parasites do, could you tell the story of the parasite that gets into ants, the lancet fluke.  And what's the advantage to the parasite for the ant to be up there?  What's so amazing about that is not just the control that the parasite is having over the ant, that life cycle that you're describing is so complicated. It's having to go through three different animals over the course of its normal life cycle.  It's really hard to talk about without ascribing a kind of intentionality to them. Which, they don't have consciousness, they don't have brains in any way. It's hard for us to even understand what they're doing without kind of putting that on them.  It seems like all the parasites break down into two different groups. There are the kinds that actually get inside a host and then kill it off in their drive to survive, and then there are others which actually just kind of live inside and are happily living inside forever. They want the host to survive. Could you just tell the example of the creature that eats the fish's tongue?  So many of these stories just are such gross-out stories on a visceral level.  Thinking about this as much as you have, do you start to see everything as being parasites?  Is one side winning?  The parasites have the upper hand?  I know, but we know about them, they don't know about us. We're the ones with the brains and the thinking and the consciousness.  Mr. Zimmer, whose side are you on?  Because, Mr. Zimmer, at some point we're all going to have to choose sides in this war. Speaking for the other humans, I want to say you're either with us or against us.  Wait a second. Are you saying this because they could sense that you are in league with them?  Cathy, we haven't even started to talk.  Is it just the thought of just not being back at all?  How many kids ended up having to get glasses?  So, were you surprised at the reaction?  And did anybody say to her, look, the way that we usually do this is if the board asks you to do some like this, we talk about it and come up with a solution together?  Somebody said that.  And when this has come up, what does she say?  As if a seventh grader would care?  Well, what would happen when you would tell them?  Right, but the problem is, at this school, you guys are already thinking all the time about how do we become better teachers? What can we do? What's the latest? Every single day you all are thinking that. So you guys are so far ahead of this, and yet they're asking you to go back to the most basic kind of thinking.  Why? Describe more, what did it change from, to?  Did you notice a change in morale, or the number of hours the teachers were working, or anything like that?  Did she, in the end, not agree with the basic program of what was going on at the school?  Yeah. Explain how many of them left.  Do you think that could happen at Irving?  I understand that that's the intent, but I think that what the Irving teachers would tell you is that the times that they've applied for waivers, like with their report card, they were turned down pretty firmly on that.  I got to say, hearing you say this, I feel like your heart is in the right place. I think the way that things are getting implemented, it's happening in a way that's making a lot of teachers unhappy at this particular school.  Hello, Cathy?  Hi, it's Ira Glass.  How the hell are you?  Well, I'm calling you. It's now the Fall. Summer has passed. Have you got a minute?  So what did you decide?  Where are you standing this week, on whether or not you're going to stay? So Dr. Hackett, you sounds like a prime candidate for somebody who'd be voting for John Kerry. What's holding you back from going to Kerry? You can't believe you're saying this, why? Did you used to hate his guts? Yeah. Listen to yourself. And can I just ask you, when you say that John Kerry is so liberal, I know that that's said all the time, but do you have in mind any specific things that you know that he's voted for that are too liberal for you? Well, listen, I think we're going to want to check back with you and just kind of see how it's going as things heat up. Hello, Dr. Hackett? It's Ira Glass. Gig? So it's early September, it's the week after the Republican convention. You know, when I last talked to you, you said that the next time that I checked in, you would probably be despairing. You mean the whole post-war planning? You know, the next big thing that's going to happen is going to be the debates. Hi. Hi, Ira. Good to meet you. Written on your arm is? Did you buy that? And I disagree with you, but again I would point out-- But again, I would point out to you that you probably agree with Kerry on this issue. Stem cell research. Yeah. You know, in all these things where you're saying the President has convictions, and they're unpopular things to do, you don't notice that you side with the other guy. And somehow, you're siding with the president because he's doing something that you don't like. It's crazy jujitsu. You're saying, you know what, you know what I like about that guy, you know why I'm going to vote for him? He take stands that I hate and I disagree with. It seems really crazy. But you value that above somebody who's making popular decisions that you agree with? But who cares if he has integrity from your point of view, if he has integrity in supporting policies that you disagree with? In some sense, like, who cares if Kerry is a suck-up? He's a suck-up who's sucking up to you. He wants to do what you want. You know, it strikes me, you keep saying, if only the Democrats had nominated anybody but Kerry, but don't you think, whoever they nominated, the Republicans would have painted them in some sort of way where you would be saying this about them? How? But didn't they do exactly the same thing with Clinton? They painted him as a flip-flopper. Yeah, and on the same grounds. And you want to know why? Because he was a suck-up. Seriously, that's what-- He did. He wanted to take the popular position, much like John Kerry. That's why he held all the positions that you held. That's why you like him in retrospect. Because all the things that you like, he looked at polling data, and he said, you know what, most people like that, so who cares what I, Bill Clinton, think, I'm just going to be for that stuff. OK, so Bill Clinton did that. Bill Clinton basically said, I'm going to look at the polls, I'm going to suck up to whatever the majority of people want. In retrospect, you like him. OK, so if that's what Kerry turns out to be, he'll look at the polls every day, whatever the majority wants, he's going to give it to them. Well, eight more years of peace and prosperity. But actually Kerry isn't the most liberal Democrat in the Senate. No. No. This is an article from the Los Angeles Times. So what you're going to have is you're going to have President Bush, and then you'll have a Republican House, a Republican Senate, and then-- You're going to be OK with the one to three-- no, no, just to play this out-- you're going to be OK with the one to three Supreme Court justices who the president will appoint, probably overturn Roe versus Wade. You're good with that, too? When he was alive, would you ever call the line or be tempted to call the line? And you'd apologize for stuff? What would you apologize for back then? Do you remember what you would say? But once you actually had a real relationship with him, you wouldn't call the line and you didn't feel a need to ever? He died in this scuba accident where he was hit by a jet skier who then fled the scene and wasn't caught. Have you thought about the kinds of people who would call the line, who used to call the line all the time, who had done bad things to other people and hurt other people, and then would flee the scene and nobody would ever know. Have you thought about those jet skiers in terms of that, in terms of the people who used to call the line? But you can imagine those people actually calling the line? If they would have called the line, if the line had existed for them, what would have happen? What would Mr. Apology have said if he were around to say it? Like in chronological order. You mean you typed it in as the user name? Because you looked around the newsroom and you just thought, "These are my peers." We can make a phone call for free.  So you're Brita?  From the phone message?  And at the moment when you're making this phone call, you're hanging upside down being held in place by your seat belt. It seems like it would be hard to talk normally.  The most amazing thing you say on this message is that moment where you pause and you just say, I love my car.  Oh, like it had done nothing to you, it had been perfect and yet, yeah.  Oh my god, like you married the wrong person.  Did you ever try to get a girl with that car?  I'm surprised that you kept the car after all these disappointing experiences.  I'm surprised that you've gone on to have seven of them in all.  So right now, you're a car tester, and that means-- just explain the procedure. You get a car every week?  And is it like being a rock critic where most of the CDs that a rock critic will listen to just are not that interesting, they're just all kind of bland? And so most of the cars that you're driving just aren't that interesting?  But what you're saying is that what makes a car fun is an element of danger.  Right, right, right. Because if the machine basically does it all for you, then there's no fun in it for you. And that joke would kill. Hey, Joe, when you signed up for the Guard, did you ever think that you would be deployed? You did? And if they had asked you whether or not you wanted to do that, would you have said that you wanted to do it, or that you wouldn't have wanted to do it? What do most of these guys think they were signing up for? When you see that early footage of yourself saying, oh, it's going to be kind of fun. It'll be an adventure. Do you feel like, man, you don't even know what you're in for? In the film, Joe, early on, you say this, that a lot of the guys weren't taking the training seriously enough. What did you see that made you say that? What was happening? How well-prepared were you for what you're doing now every day? That's the month that they captured those private contractors and killed them and hung them from that bridge. That's when it really all changed. And so you didn't actually do drills on what to do if you're in a vehicle in a convoy and an IED goes off? That's not something you practiced for. And how could they have trained you to prepare for those? And did that make everybody mad? Were you mad? Now over a half a year after all that, in December, National Guardsmen from Tennessee brought up this exact problem with Defense Secretary Donald Rumsfeld in this town meeting they held over there. Now, Secretary of Defense Rumsfeld said that they're getting out the armored vehicles as quickly as they can. And he said, you go to war with the army you have, not the army you want. What do you think of that? But they didn't anticipate that there were going to be these insurgents at this level. They didn't necessarily know that there was going to be a need for it. Right. He got killed in an ambush of a Humvee. This footage in the documentary of you talking to your troops about it, they all look pretty shaken up as you're saying this stuff to them. Did some of them come and talk to you about it later? Yeah, what do you say to somebody when they tell you something like that? What can help them? And what would they say? They're patriotic guys, so they're doing their duty and all that, want to support the President. But what's that do to them to see that? Is there a downside to coming home? What are you talking about? People say this to you? And what do you think? Did you see him when you were home? At their games. Wow. So you're at their games in this small town, so all these people you'd rather not be having to deal with, you have to deal with. And the guys in your unit, what kind of attitude are you getting from them? I don't need to know, but now I'm sort of wondering what that is. And the box, in this case, is the school building? They're thinking outside the box. I wonder what one of those excursions would be? I would think the laser show would actually still be in the box. Now is he doing anything in these pictures? Does he look like he's somebody pulling a prank? What's he look like? What's his name? Sam Melnic? That's just like a known thing? You're flipping to the back now? Did you actually go to your friends and say, check this out? Did you actually have the most photos in the yearbook? Wow, that's a huge achievement. You guys have to meet. If this were a romantic comedy, if this were a movie right now, you guys would end up in love. But also, you'd be arch rivals for a while because you'd be trying to keep him out of the yearbook. It tells a little story. But in fact, he didn't do that at all? Yeah. So he's your buddy, and you're watching him clean out his locker to go. How would people say it? Were they sheepish about it? Or they just didn't even know to be sheepish about it? But then his season improved. He actually wen on a kind of streak. And his whole vision of where he was heading came back to him. And that's what keeps somebody going in this situation. There had always been so much proof, you know. He'd been a high school star, an all-state and a college star, an all-Big Ten, and his brother Hal Morris was playing for the Reds. Did they have a Klandshake? I never thought to think that, actually, you had to buy your robe from them. I just somehow thought that they all made their own robes. And Kennedy wrote about this in his own writing, correct? Ah, very clever, though, the ending, that he basically has to call you even if he's not the guy, just to put your mind at ease. Wait, you know there's a third option, and that is that he knows he didn't meet you, but he just wants to meet a girl. Wow. I have to say, you were meeting him, like, for him to be the person on the phone when you're expecting the cable guy, did that make it seem more romantic? Like, you guys were meeting, so cute. Or did it make it feel like you didn't even want to deal? Wow. I love how, because you're running a con, suddenly you believe everybody is running a con. Oh, right. Like, just googling your name on the internet. Right, it's embarrassing to say, no, no, no, I was just lying there. It's embarrassing. Yes. But there were only two possibilities. Either he actually believes that he met you, or he knows he didn't. Right? Yeah. I find that very convincing, actually. I wasn't actually sure what I thought up until you said that, but, actually, now I actually believe that he completely knew that he was lying. I actually believe there's no chance that he actually thought he met you. I love how this started off as this innocent little romantic lie. And then, before it's done, you yourself are caught up in this whole world of where you can't even figure out how to convince him. And you can't figure out why he's saying what he's saying. Like, your mind so messed with by the end of this story. In the end, Chris did to Charlie what Charlie does so well to other people. He pretended to have an experience that he wasn't actually having, and Charlie thought the fake-out was real. And when he found out the truth, Charlie reacted the way other people do to him in that situation. He was sort of upset, a little hurt. And then he comforted himself by deciding that some part of the fake-out was real. I actually have a transcript of your testimony right here. And it's really amazing what you say when you're on the stand. Like you say that you're not against the death penalty. You say, here we go, I'm just going to quote directly. Here is a part in the transcript I'm just looking through. Hold on. Where you say-- this is just a really amazing thing to say to a jury. You say, "Well as far as me being convicted of capital murder, I don't hold no hard feelings toward the jury at all. Let me say this here. As long as they took the evidence and felt me guilty in their own minds as the evidence was presented to them, I don't hold no hard feelings towards them. I'm not against the death penalty." How much of a risk did you think you were taking? Well how much of a risk, how much of a chance did you think you had that you might get executed? And so you felt-- Well that's what you want to see. Yeah, wow. And at that point, did you think maybe I made a mistake choosing the death penalty? So if you hadn't taken this risk during that trial, do you think you'd be free right now? You'd still be in there? Right. I remember those. Now you have in your hand a copy of the text of the letter. Could I ask you to read it? And so, what did you think? In a way, like the indignity of it, you know what I mean? You're having this little fond feeling and then just, oh, it's for a marketing campaign. Right. So you had played no football. Wow. That is hard line. She literally like raised the specter of the brown shirts. And you only know that because you've seen that in the movies? Die Jew? And is there a part of you where like your blood is running a little cold? Is there somewhere in your mind the thought that they are messing with you? That they've totally sussed out this situation, they know you don't know what you're doing, and they're just screwing with you now? God, what a shame we don't have that in our daily lives. And in the first moment that she opens the card, did she try to pass it off, or did she instantly say to you-- Was that satisfying? Right, you're still mad at that young dad. But how unsatisfying for you and for everyone who wants to confront their parents given the fact that the people who they're mad are gone and have been replaced by these kinder, gentler, more sensitive people. Wow. They mixed the two brothers? His sperm and your dad's sperm. And is that the most horrible thing you can imagine when he says that? Is that very much like a Darth Vader-- Did it seem believable to you at all? The mixing the sperm? It's such a beautiful idea, though. It's like a firing squad, but in reverse. Like in a firing squad, each person would choose to believe they weren't the one who hit the prisoner. And in this, everybody would choose to believe they were the one. Going back to year you were born but not before? Oh. So was it helpful? Though everybody has that feeling at one point or another when they're a kid. And what were the differences? And you mean overly sensitive like literally you were just an emotional kid, an overly emotional kid? About the jar? Can I ask you a couple of really basic questions before we go on to what happens next? Who do you look like? OK. And Uncle Abie? What did Uncle Abie's body look like? That's what Abie said to him? Yeah, suddenly it seems like it's probably true. But somebody did do that. They did it in 1981 when your dad died. Oh really? Which part wants your dad to win and which part wants Abie to win? What's the advantage of each? So if you got to choose, if you got to imagine your dad going around and collecting other samples besides from your Uncle Abie, who would you want to choose? He can roam all over New York City in the year 1948. Who do you want him to stop by? He was just an electronics hobbyists? Like an old radio hobbyist? And so if he were the guy, that would be good. Like the whole thing actually gives you solace in a way that it doesn't with Uncle Abie. Do you feel bad at all for thinking that it's possible that your dad isn't your dad? I'll show you. I'm no longer going to be your son. And who might that have been? Just somebody who worked at the hospital? Lenny, both your parents have been dead for decades. But if what you're saying is right, you might have a living parent in New York right now. Knowing that he could be out there and alive, your actual dad, doesn't that make you want to find him? This is the secretary of the Department of Housing and Urban Development? So it got up to the United States Cabinet. OK. And Janesville is a town of how big? You get a lot of attention from the US Cabinet over there? Yeah. And just to be clear, for the record, do you oppose the Christian church? Yeah. Who were you just saying that to? You just put your hand over the phone, and you said, he wants to know, for the record, if I oppose the Christian church. Have you ever celebrated Christmas, the holiday of the Christian church? Right. Because in a way, you're in a very cut and dry situation. There are state standards. You're supposed to teach them. And you're just teaching them. That was the first time? There was more than one time? Did you ever think of, like, what year is this that I'm having to fight this? Do you happen to know what song it was? Yeah. So there's a kind of political correctness. You feel embattled. But still, 84% of Americans identify themselves as Christian. 6 out of 10 Americans say religion is very important in their lives. Only 16% of Americans say religion isn't important. Christians have Christmas off. It's sanctioned by the state. There's no mail service on Sunday. Attendance at evangelical churches is going up. Like-- I guess I don't-- where is the persecution of Christians? Do you believe that we can be a moral nation without being Christian? And so if there's a person who believes any of the things that you don't believe-- who believes that a woman should have a right to an abortion, or who believes that gay men and gay women should be allowed to marry-- do you think that the reason that shouldn't be the law in the United States is because we're supposed to be a Christian nation? Do you think a law like this could pass? As you write in your book, they mention a creator in the Declaration of Independence, they mention a creator in the Articles of Confederation. In many state constitutions, they mention a creator. But here, they consciously do not mention a creator at all. Now you should explain what a religious test is. That means-- And their argument, you write, is basically, the reason why we got into this mess and now we're at war is because when we wrote the Constitution, God wasn't in the Constitution, and now God is basically punishing us for that. Now, how'd they do with that? You write that they did meet with President Lincoln. But they seem so much less demonstrative.  And what did you think? Did you think somehow his memory got transferred? That's love right there. Oh, you don't know if Chance was just like this back in the day? Now, here's one of the things I've been really wondering about your situation. Is I wonder if having Second Chance around all the time, is it ever painful for you because it reminds you that you don't have Chance? It's like here you have this ghost of your favorite animal walking the property who isn't exactly Chance, and if it just kind of breaks your heart a little bit? Oh my God. He gored him like in his crotch? What did you see? So Ralph, how you feeling? So you were saying when we talked before that you felt like with Second Chance, what you've got is 95% of what Chance was, and I wonder if after this incident you might downgrade him to just 80% or 70%? Come on, you think really, 95% after that? What would Second Chance have to do to convince you he's never going to be like Chance? Like how many times would he have to attack you?  Yeah. You still have hope? Like you read an article. And why would that be bad, Nancy? Oxygen and form water.  The Hindenburg disaster, yeah.  And then you had to re-enact it on a stage in front of people, and you had no idea what it referred to?  Did you know what the Salem witch trials were?  Yeah. Because the world is so--  That ever happened. Sure. Absolutely. Right.  Well, I can see the confusion.  You'd be in the middle of a scene with another performer, and suddenly that's what you would do? You would just get a stumper?  Does that work?  Did you get into social situations that were awkward in exactly the same way that being on stage was awkward, where people would be talking about stuff and you wouldn't know what the hell is going on, and then, basically, you would just turn into the troll?  Did you find yourself in the situation, though, where in order to actually get out the message that you wanted to get out that you would be doing shows and would be giving interviews where a part of the interview would be, "well, tell us your sad story," and then another part would be, "OK, so now, what are you here to talk about?"  And what did you understand about E-Online?  Eliot Spitzer the attorney general?  What is E-Online?  Did the thought occur to you, "I can just leave, I can walk out the door?"  Oh, my.  Oh, my.  And at that point, are you trying to plan out something to say to her?  What's so crazy about that is you're saying you weren't sure what to say, but who would know what to say? It's a situation were, what can possibly be said to somebody, you know?  You know, one of the things about this whole experience you had that's so strange is that somehow, like, if you think about the people who they were bringing up, like, there was the guy who was the alcoholic. And then there was the woman who lost her son. And then there's the woman who had had both things happen to her. And then they bring you on as like, here's the very worst thing we can think of.  You know what I mean? Like you're trumping all of these other tragedies because of 9/11, right?  And then you're going to be the expert who's going to step in and heal and solve the problem of the people who are sort of less expert than you because you've gone through something so much more intense than they could even understand somehow. Do you know what I mean?  At that point, you're sort of like a walking symbol. Do you know what I mean?  Has that worn off over time?  Like what happens when you date?  So at some point in the weeks and months after 9/11, you really became a kind of spokesperson through a series of accidents, almost.  Were there other times that you found yourself as a spokesperson in just very strange situations?  Oh, wait, and you're New Yorkers, so you're probably Democrats.  Did you find yourself in a situation where you were meeting, like, high level administration officials? Did you meet the president? Did you meet--  Really?  This was in the run-up to Iraq by then.  Which is really not a good feeling in the Rose Garden.  Is there some more direct thing that you can say than, "you're taking the death of my husband and using to start an inappropriate war?" What is the mean version of that? What were you holding back?  And what did you want to say? What does a person say to that?  And do you think it's just the combination of being in the most alien environment possible and then suddenly just like missing your husband so intensely, like it's all coming together once? Like, that's why?  Did you feel protected by your public role in that sort of situation? That is, you're there as somebody whose husband died, and in a way that it gives you a sort of protection. You know what I mean? In other words, it doesn't matter what the governor says, it doesn't matter what the local people say, basically once that happens, they can just go ahead and do what needs to be done to fix the problem? And they didn't need to wait for the state? Can I ask you, before you tell what happens next, why not just evacuate? So you walk back to the hospital, and what do you find there? And so did you find the cigarettes? And were they dry? And when you say cover the first floor, was it actually coming inside the hospital building? How often do you see that? And where'd they send him to? So you are in hospital until-- and there's no power in the hospital, but there's water, and it sounds like there's food too. Oh really? So how long were you in the hospital? How many days? When did you get out? And then the buses come in and they take you where? So wait, they're just taking any random truck and hotwiring it? And so what was the vehicle that you got to the next place in? What were you in? Right, a locksmith? And then you go to where? Did you go inside at all? What did you see? Yeah. So then what do you do? What's the best you can do? And where did you all sleep? You mean that's what people were saying to each other? And is that what you believed? And so people were saying, basically they just brought us here, they're going to leave us here to die? So we keep hearing in the news about violence inside the convention center, and people getting killed, and women being raped. Did you know about any of that when you were there? And talk about, there were men just kind of like roaming with guns, packs of men. And so these were just guys from the neighborhood? What else were they doing? And did you see this yourself, these guys? And so basically, they went off to this Rite-Aid, they got the stuff, they brought it back and started distributing it? Like Robin Hood? Why didn't people just walk away? That's what I don't understand. And literally, they would just like go a couple streets away, and somebody would send them back? And why? Bad place to get sick. This shooting, this was something you saw? Just like somebody's lost luggage that never like-- So that's where it ends up? So how's it been here? Like, do you come out of this experience feeling kind of impressed with what they've done here in Houston, or--? Why? Why? What was the sign of that? You were 22. Did it seem like it might work to you? They were on real shows. And then the office manager gives the word, the auditors have arrived. And at that point, people start bustling around, boxes are being carried from place to place. These are the people from Anheuser-Busch. But what's so crazy about the whole scheme is that it's the sort of thing that somebody would do in a sitcom. Do you know what I mean? Oh, I know what we'll do. We'll hire actors to pretend to be the office workers. Right. You are in the white Bronco, all of a sudden. To make the front of the plane lighter? So you're on the plane thinking about the fact that you just had this huge fight. There's been a bunch of press attention to the fact that there were people writing goodbye notes and things like that. Did you see people doing that? Yeah. So the TV actually turned out to be sort of comforting. Wow. So in sum, actually, if you had a choice, you'd rather have had the TV? So during this two hours after you find out you're going to make an emergency landing, Alexandra, as somebody like you, who actually has to stop herself from picturing the different ways your plane can go down, are you actually picturing it, now that you're in a situation where--? And before the actual landing, like, as you're coming in for that final descent, did you think then, oh, I guess I could die now? Why? It's almost like you got bored with being afraid. Wait, you laugh as you say that, because--? Right. This is you actually just giving your visa card to somebody and you're like yeah, yeah. It seems like such an incredibly awkward thing having to do. What happened after that? Because during those 7 to 10 days you're thinking, these people are deciding they hate us and they're spending word about how we killed these people, like it's just the worst thing from a propaganda point of view and winning over people's hearts. That's what your fear is? And do you remember what he said at the beginning, like so as to explain? What do you remember of what he said? You know, just thinking about that accidental bombing, the way that it ended up working out, did that accidental bombing actually give you access to people and a way to meet with them and a reason to meet with them that you might not have had otherwise? Right. And that's where you get into such immeasurable things. Because if, in fact, a democracy is created in the Mideast and it changes the whole shape of the Mideast-- I know, but the thing that seems so hard is we're measuring an actual concrete number against a benefit that really can't be measured at all. If by changing the shape of the Middle East we prevent a nuclear attack on New York City, or Cairo, or just anywhere, then it just changes the equation. And it seems like what you've got is you've got a certain number of dead bodies on one side, and then a future that's yet unlived on the other.